Utah statutes.
17D-1-509.   Ratification of previously issued bonds and previously entered
contracts.
All bonds issued or contracts entered into by a special service district
before May 5, 2008 are ratified, validated, and confirmed and declared to be
valid and legally binding obligations of the special service district in
accordance with their terms.
